New York, session 2025-2026, A6454.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 5-108 2 to read as follows: 3 § 5-108. Verification of voter qualifications; citizenship. The state 4 board of elections shall participate in the systematic alien verifica- 5 tion for entitlements (SAVE) program, administered by the United States 6 citizenship and immigration services agency, to verify that a person who 7 is either registered or registering to vote is a United States citizen. 8 Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the state 9 board of elections is authorized to share and transmit all relevant 10 information provided by a person, who is either registered or register- 11 ing to vote, to the state board of elections with the United States 12 citizenship and immigration services agency for the purpose of verifying 13 such person's citizenship status. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05175-01-5